src/import/nouns.lexc
ehituskrunt+N:ehitus#kr´un,t TAUD ;
ehituskunst+N:ehitus#k´un,st TAUD ;
ehituslugu+N:ehitus#luG1u%{stemill%} KAVA ;
ehitusmaterjal+N:ehitus#materjal TAUD ;
ehitusmees+N:ehitus#me MEES ;
ehitusmeister+N:ehitus#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
ehitusosakond+N:ehitus#`osak´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
ehitusplats+N:ehitus#pl´at,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehitusseadus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus#s´eadus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehitustegevus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehitus#tegevus OLULINE ;
ehitusturg+N:ehitus#t´urG1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
ehitustöö+N:ehitus#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
ehitustööline+N:ehitus#t´ööline SUULINE ;
ehmatamine+N:ehmatamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehmatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ehmatus OLULINE ;
ehmes+N:´ehme KOTKAS ;
ehmumine+N:´ehmumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehmus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ehmus SUULINE ;
ehteasi+N:´ehte#´as,J1%>%{pl.u%} ASI ;
ehtekaup+N:´ehte#k´aup%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ehtsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ehtsus SUULINE ;
ei-sõna+N:´ei-sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eideetik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eideetik VIRSIK ;
eideke+N:eideke PEENIKE ;
eideköbi+N:eide#köbi KAVA ;
eiderhani+N:eider#han, NIMI ;
eidetism+N:eidet´ism TAUD ;
eidetudi+N:eide#tud,i KAVA ;
eikellegimaa+N:ei#kellegi#m´aa%>%{id%} PUU ;
eimidagitegemine+N:ei#midagi#tegemine OLULINE ;
eimiski+N:ei#m´iski AASTA ;
eine+N:´eine PINGE ;
einela+N:´einela AASTA ;
einelaud+N:´eine#l´auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
einestamine+N:einestamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@einestus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@einestus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@einetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@einetus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@einsats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eins´at,s TAUD ;
eiraja+N:´eiraja AASTA ;
eiramine+N:´eiramine OLULINE ;
eit+N:´eit%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
eitamine+N:´eitamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eitus SUULINE ;
eitussõna+N:´eitus#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ejakulatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ejakulatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekipaaž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekip´aaž TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@ekker+N:@R.Part.One@@P.Stem.Nom@´ekkE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eklektik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekl`ektik VIRSIK ;
eklektika+N:ekl`ektika AASTA ;
eklektitsism+N:eklektits´ism TAUD ;
ekliptika+N:ekl`iptika AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekläär+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekl´äär TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekossees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekoss´ees TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekraan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekr´aan TAUD ;
ekraanipilt+N:ekr`aani#p´il,t TAUD ;
ekraaniteos+N:ekr`aani#t´eos SOOLANE ;
eksabikaasa+N:´eks#abi#kaasa PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaltatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksaltatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksalteeritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksalteeritus OLULINE ;
eksalteerunu+N:eksalt´eerunu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksam+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksam REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaminaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksamin´aator REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksaminand+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksamin´and TAUD ;
eksamineerija+N:eksamin´eerija AASTA ;
eksamineeritav+N:eksamineeritav MAGUS ;
eksamipäev+N:´eksami#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekseem+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks´eem TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksegees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekseg´ees TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksegeet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekseg´eet TAUD ;
eksegeetika+N:eksegeetika AASTA ;
eksekuteerija+N:eksekut´eerija AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksekutsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksekutsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksekuutor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksek´uutor REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksempel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks´empE2l REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksemplar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksemplar TAUD ;
ekshibitsionism+N:ekshibitsion´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiarvamus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksi#´arvamus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiil+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks´iil TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksiilvalitsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eks´iil#valitsus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksimatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksimatus SUULINE ;
eksimine+N:´eksimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksimus OLULINE ;
eksinu+N:´eksinu AASTA ;
eksirada+N:eksi#raJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
eksisamm+N:eksi#s´amm%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
eksisteerimine+N:eksist´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksistents+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`eksist´ents TAUD ;
eksistentsialism+N:eksistentsial´ism TAUD ;
eksitaja+N:eksitaja AASTA ;
eksitamine+N:eksitamine OLULINE ;
eksitee+N:eksi#t´ee%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksitus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksivus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksivus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekskavaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekskav´aator REDEL ;
eksklaav+N:eks#kl´aav TAUD ;
ekskomissar+N:´eks#komissar TAUD ;
ekskommunist+N:´eks#kommun´ist TAUD ;
ekskreet+N:eks#kr´eet TAUD ;
ekskrement+N:eks#krem´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekskursant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekskurs´an,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekskursioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekskursi´oon TAUD ;
ekskursioonijuht+N:ekskursi`ooni#j´uhT1 TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekskurss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksk´urss TAUD ;
ekslibrist+N:eks#libr´ist TAUD ;
eksliibris+N:eks#liibris SOOLANE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekslikkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksli´kkus OLULINE ;
ekslinnapea+N:´eks#linna#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
eksmaailmameister+N:´eks#m´aa#ilma#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
eksmatrikulatsioon+N:eks#matrikulatsi´oon TAUD ;
eksmeister+N:´eks#m´eistE2r REDEL ;
eksminister+N:´eks#min´istE2r REDEL ;
eksmiss+N:´eks#m´iss TAUD ;
eksoallergeen+N:ekso#`allerg´een TAUD ;
eksootika+N:eksootika AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksootilisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksootilisus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspander+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksp´andE2r REDEL ;
ekspankur+N:´eks#p´ankur REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspansiivsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekspans´iivsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspansioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekspansi´oon TAUD ;
ekspatriatsioon+N:eks#patriatsi´oon TAUD ;
ekspeaminister+N:´eks#p´ea#min´istE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspediitor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksped´iitor REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspeditsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekspeditsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksperiment+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksperim´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksperimentaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksperiment´aator REDEL ;
eksperimenteerija+N:eksperiment´eerija AASTA ;
eksperimenteerimine+N:eksperiment´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspert+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksp´ert TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspertarvamus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksp´ert#´arvamus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspertiis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekspert´iis TAUD ;
ekspertiisiakt+N:ekspert`iisi#´akt TAUD ;
eksplikatsioon+N:eks#plikatsi´oon TAUD ;
eksplosioon+N:eks#plosi´oon TAUD ;
ekspluataator+N:eks#pluat´aator REDEL ;
ekspluatatsioon+N:eks#pluatatsi´oon TAUD ;
ekspluateerija+N:eks#pluat´eerija AASTA ;
ekspolitseinik+N:´eks#polits´ein´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksponaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekspon´aat TAUD ;
eksponeerimine+N:ekspon´eerimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksponent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekspon´ent TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksponomeeter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`eksponom´eetE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksport+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´eksp´ort TAUD ;
eksportija+N:eksp´ortija AASTA ;
eksportimine+N:eksp´ortimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksportöör+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`eksport´öör TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspositsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekspositsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekspress+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ekspr´es,s TAUD ;
ekspressionism+N:eks#pression´ism TAUD ;
ekspressioon+N:eks#pressi´oon TAUD ;
eksprompt+N:eks#pr´ompt TAUD ;
ekspropriaator+N:eks#propri´aator REDEL ;
ekspropriatsioon+N:eks#propriatsi´oon TAUD ;
eksproprieerija+N:eks#propri´eerija AASTA ;
ekspulsioon+N:eks#pulsi´oon TAUD ;
eksrahandusminister+N:´eks#rahandus#min´istE2r REDEL ;
eksriigikogulane+N:´eks#riigi#kogulane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekst´aas TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstaatik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstaatik VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksterjöör+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`eksterj´öör TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstern+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekst´ern TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@eksternatuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@eksternat´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstrakt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstr´akt TAUD ;
ekstraktimine+N:ekstr´aktimine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstraktsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstraktsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstrapolatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ekstrapolatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstravagantsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ekstravag´antsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstravert+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´ekstrav´ert TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstreem+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstr´eem TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstreemsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstr´eemsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstreemum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstr´eemum REDEL ;
ekstremism+N:ekstrem´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstremist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ekstrem´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ekstsellents+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ekstsell´ents TAUD ;
ekstsentrik+N:eks#ts`entrik VIRSIK ;
